Washington statutes.
RCW 31.04.145

Investigations and examinations—Director's duties and powers—Production of information—Costs.

(1) For the purpose of discovering violations of this chapter or securing information lawfully required under this chapter, the director may at any time, either personally or by designees, investigate or examine the loans and business and, wherever located, the books, accounts, records, papers, documents, files, and other information used in the business of every licensee and of every person subject to this chapter, whether the person acts or claims to act as principal or agent, or under or without the authority of this chapter. The director or designated representative:

(a) Must have free access to the employees, offices, and places of business, books, accounts, papers, documents, other information, records, files, safes, and vaults of all such persons during normal business hours;

(b) May require the attendance of and examine under oath all persons whose testimony may be required about the loans or the business or the subject matter of any investigation, examination, or hearing and may require such person to produce books, accounts, papers, records, files, and any other information the director or designated persons deem relevant to the inquiry;

(c) May require by directive, subpoena, or any other lawful means the production of original books, accounts, papers, records, files, and other information; may require that such original books, accounts, papers, records, files, and other information be copied; or may make copies of such original books, accounts, papers, records, files, or other information;

(d) May issue a subpoena or subpoena duces tecum requiring attendance by any person identified in this section or compelling production of any books, accounts, papers, records, files, or other documents or information identified in this section.

(2) The director must make such periodic examinations of the affairs, business, office, and records of each licensee as determined by rule.

(3) Every licensee examined or investigated by the director or the director's designee must pay to the director the cost of the examination or investigation of each licensed place of business as determined by rule by the director.

(4) In order to carry out the purposes of this section, the director may:

(a) Retain attorneys, accountants, or other professionals and specialists as examiners, auditors, or investigators to conduct or assist in the conduct of examinations or investigations;

(b) Enter into agreements or relationships with other government officials or regulatory associations in order to improve efficiencies and reduce regulatory burden by sharing resources, standardized or uniform methods or procedures, and documents, records, information, or evidence obtained under this section;

(c) Use, hire, contract, or employ public or privately available analytical systems, methods, or software to examine or investigate the licensee, individual, or person subject to chapter 120, Laws of 2009;

(d) Accept and rely on examination or investigation reports made by other government officials, within or without this state;

(e) Accept audit reports made by an independent certified public accountant for the licensee, individual, or person subject to chapter 120, Laws of 2009 in the course of that part of the examination covering the same general subject matter as the audit and may incorporate the audit report in the report of the examination, report of investigation, or other writing of the director; or

(f) Assess the licensee, individual, or person subject to chapter 120, Laws of 2009 the cost of the services in (a) of this subsection.

(5) The director's obligations or duties under chapter 62, Laws of 2018 are subject to section 21, chapter 62, Laws of 2018.

[ 2018 c 62 s 15; 2015 c 229 s 29; 2012 c 17 s 5; 2009 c 120 s 8; 2001 c 81 s 11; 1995 c 9 s 2; 1994 c 92 s 169; 1991 c 208 s 15.]

NOTES:

Findings—Declaration—2009 c 120: See note following RCW 31.04.015.